Utah statutes.
67-4a-703.   Interest and penalties.

(1)  A person who fails to pay or deliver property within the time required by this chapter shall pay interest to the administrator at the rate of 12% per annum on the property or value of the property from the date the property should have been paid or delivered.

(2) (a)  A person who willfully fails to file any report, or perform a duty required by this chapter, or to pay or deliver property to the administrator as required by this chapter shall pay a civil penalty equal to 20% of the value of the property that should have been paid or delivered.

(b)  The administrator shall comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in imposing civil penalties under this section.

(3) (a)  It is unlawful for any person to willfully refuse to pay or deliver property to the administrator after written demand by the administrator as required by this chapter.

(b)  Any person who violates this Subsection (3) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(4)  The administrator may, in appropriate circumstances:

(a)  waive the payment of civil penalties;

(b)  waive the payment of interest; or

(c)  reduce the amount of the interest.

